California statutes. Commercial Code
(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 54, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 118, Sec. 2.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: The January 1, 2015, repeal provision was deleted in this amendment.)
-------------------------------------------

9321.1.

A licensee of nonexclusive rights in a motion picture that is produced pursuant to one or more collective bargaining agreements governed by the laws of the United States takes its nonexclusive license in that motion picture subject to any perfected security interest securing the obligation to pay residuals as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement and arising from exploitation under the license. The terms “motion picture” and “residuals” have the meaning ascribed to those terms under the applicable collective bargaining agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 43.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9322.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, priority among conflicting security interests and agricultural liens in the same collateral is determined according to the following rules:

(1) Conflicting perfected security interests and agricultural liens rank according to priority in time of filing or perfection. Priority dates from the earlier of the time a filing covering the collateral is first made or the security interest or agricultural lien is first perfected, if there is no period thereafter when there is neither filing nor perfection.

(2) A perfected security interest or agricultural lien has priority over a conflicting unperfected security interest or agricultural lien.

(3) The first security interest or agricultural lien to attach or become effective has priority if conflicting security interests and agricultural liens are unperfected.

(b) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the following rules apply:

(1) The time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in proceeds.

(2) The time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral supported by a supporting obligation is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in the supporting obligation.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), a security interest in collateral which qualifies for priority over a conflicting security interest under Section 9327, 9328, 9329, 9330, or 9331 also has priority over a conflicting security interest in both of the following:

(1) Any supporting obligation for the collateral.

(2) Proceeds of the collateral if all of the following conditions are
 satisfied:

(A) The security interest in proceeds is perfected.

(B) The proceeds are cash proceeds or of the same type as the collateral.

(C) In the case of proceeds that are proceeds of proceeds, all intervening proceeds are cash proceeds, proceeds of the same type as the collateral, or an account relating to the collateral.

(d) Subject to subdivision (e) and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), if a security interest in chattel paper, deposit accounts, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights is perfected by a method other than filing, conflicting perfected security interests in proceeds of the collateral rank according to priority in time of filing.

(e) Subdivision (d) applies only if the proceeds of the collateral are not cash proceeds, chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or
 letter-of-credit rights.

(f) Subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, are subject to all of the following:

(1) Subdivision (g) and the other provisions of this chapter.

(2) Section 4210 with respect to a security interest of a collecting bank.

(3) Section 5118 with respect to a security interest of an issuer or nominated person.

(4) Section 9110 with respect to a security interest arising under Division 2 (commencing with Section 2101) or Division 10 (commencing with Section 10101).

(g) A perfected agricultural lien on collateral has priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the same collateral if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9323.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for purposes of determining the priority of a perfected security interest under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9322, perfection of the security interest dates from the time an advance is made to the extent that the security interest secures an advance that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(1) It is made while the security interest is perfected only under either of the following:

(A) Under Section 9309 when it attaches.

(B) Temporarily under subdivision
 (e), (f), or (g) of Section 9312.

(2) It is not made pursuant to a commitment entered into before or while the security interest is perfected by a method other than under Section 9309 or under subdivision (e), (f), or (g) of Section 9312.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a security interest is subordinate to the rights of a person who becomes a lien creditor to the extent that the security interest secures an advance made more than 45 days after the person becomes a lien creditor unless either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The advance is made without knowledge of the lien.

(2) The advance is made pursuant to a commitment
 entered into without knowledge of the lien.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to a security interest held by a secured party who is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), a buyer of goods takes free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of the following:

(1) The time the secured party acquires knowledge of the buyer’s purchase.

(2) Forty-five days after the purchase.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not apply if the advance is made pursuant
 to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the buyer’s purchase and before the expiration of the 45-day period.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a lessee of goods takes the leasehold interest free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of either of the following:

(1) The time the secured party acquires knowledge of the lease.

(2) Forty-five days after the lease contract becomes enforceable.

(g) Subdivision (f) does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lease and before the expiration of the 45-day
 period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 48.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9324.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a perfected purchase money security interest in goods other than inventory or livestock has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same goods, and, except as otherwise provided in Section 9327, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, if the purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the collateral or within 20 days thereafter.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c) and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a perfected purchase money security interest in inventory has priority over a conflicting
 security interest in the same inventory, has priority over a conflicting security interest in chattel paper or an instrument constituting proceeds of the inventory and in proceeds of the chattel paper, if so provided in Section 9330, and, except as otherwise provided in Section 9327, also has priority in identifiable cash proceeds of the inventory to the extent the identifiable cash proceeds are received on or before the delivery of the inventory to a buyer, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the inventory.

(2) The purchase money secured party sends a signed notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest.

(3) The holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within five years before the debtor receives possession of the inventory.

(4) The notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase money security interest in inventory of the debtor and describes the inventory.

(c) Paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of inventory as follows:

(1) If the purchase money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing.

(2) If the
 purchase money security interest is temporarily
 perfected without filing or possession under subdivision (f) of Section 9312, before the beginning of the 20-day period thereunder.

(d) Subject to subdivision (e) and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a perfected purchase money security interest in livestock that are farm products has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same livestock, and, except as otherwise provided in Section 9327, a perfected security interest in their identifiable proceeds and identifiable products in their unmanufactured states also has priority, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the livestock.

(2) The purchase money secured party sends
 a signed notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest.

(3) The holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within six months before the debtor receives possession of the livestock.

(4) The notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase money security interest in livestock of the debtor and describes the livestock.

(e) Paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d) apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of livestock as follows:

(1) If the purchase money security
 interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing.

(2) If the purchase money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under subdivision (f) of Section 9312, before the beginning of the 20-day period thereunder.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a perfected purchase money security interest in software has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same collateral, and, except as otherwise provided in Section 9327, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, to the extent that the purchase money security interest in the goods in which the software was acquired for use has priority in the goods and proceeds of the goods under this section.

(g) If more than one security interest qualifies for priority in the same collateral under subdivision (a), (b), (d), or (f), the following
 rules apply:

(1) A security interest securing an obligation incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral has priority over a security interest securing an obligation incurred for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in, or the use of, collateral.

(2) In all other cases, subdivision (a) of Section 9322 applies to the qualifying security interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 49.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9325.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a security interest created by a debtor is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral created by another person if all of the following apply:

(1) The debtor acquired the collateral subject to the security interest created by the other person.

(2) The security interest created by the other person was perfected when the debtor acquired the collateral.

(3) There is no period thereafter when the security interest is unperfected.

(b) Subdivision (a) subordinates a security interest only if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The security interest otherwise would have priority solely under subdivision (a) of Section 9322 or under Section 9324.

(2) The security interest arose solely under subdivision (3) of Section 2711 or subdivision (5) of Section 10508.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9326.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a security interest that is created by a new debtor in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights and is perfected solely by a filed financing statement that would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the application of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 9316 or Section 9508 is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral which is perfected other than by such a filed financing statement.

(b) The other provisions of this chapter determine the priority among conflicting security interests in the same collateral perfected by filed financing statements described in subdivision (a). However, if the
 security agreements to which a new debtor became bound as debtor were not entered into by the same original debtor, the conflicting security interests rank according to priority in time of the new debtor’s having become bound.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 13.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9326.1.

A security interest in a controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible held by a secured party having control of the account, electronic record, or payment intangible has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 50.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9327.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same deposit account:

(1) A security interest held by a secured party having control of the deposit account under Section 9104 has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (3) and (4), security interests perfected by control under Section 9314 rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (4), a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

(4) A security interest perfected by control under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104 has priority over a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account
 is maintained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9328.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

(1) A security interest held by a secured party having control of investment property under Section 9106 has priority over a security interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the investment property.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (3) and (4), conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which has control under Section 9106 rank according to priority in time of one of the following:

(A) If the collateral is a security, obtaining control.

(B) If the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and if the secured party obtained control under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106, the secured party’s becoming the person for which the securities account is maintained.

(C) If the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and if the secured party obtained control under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106, the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the secured party’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried, or to be carried, in the securities account.

(D) If the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and if the secured party obtained control through another person under paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106, the time on which priority would be based under this paragraph if the other person were the secured party.

(E) If the collateral is a commodity contract carried with a commodity intermediary, the satisfaction of the requirement for control specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 9106 with respect to commodity contracts carried, or to be carried, with the commodity
 intermediary.

(3) A security interest held by a securities intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities account maintained with the securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

(4) A security interest held by a commodity intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

(5) A security interest in a certificated security in registered form which is perfected by taking delivery under subdivision (a) of Section 9313 and not by control under Section 9314 has priority over a conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control.

(6) Conflicting security interests created by a broker, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary which are perfected without control under Section
 9106 rank equally.

(7) In all other cases, priority among conflicting security interests in investment property is governed by Sections 9322 and 9323.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9329.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same letter-of-credit right:

(1) A security interest held by a secured party having control of the letter-of-credit right under Section 9107 has priority to the extent of its control over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control.

(2) Security interests perfected by control under Section 9314 rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9330.

(a) A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) In good faith and in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, the purchaser gives new value, takes possession of each authoritative tangible copy of the record evidencing the chattel paper, and obtains control under Section 9105 of each
 authoritative electronic copy of the record evidencing the chattel paper.

(2) The authoritative copies of the record evidencing the chattel paper do not indicate that the chattel paper has been assigned to an identified assignee other than the purchaser.

(b) A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed other than merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if the purchaser gives new value, takes possession of each authoritative tangible copy of the record evidencing the chattel paper, and obtains control under Section 9105 of each authoritative electronic copy of the record evidencing the chattel paper in good faith, in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, and without
 knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9327, a purchaser having priority in chattel paper under subdivision (a) or (b) also has priority in proceeds of the chattel paper to the extent that either of the following applies:

(1) Section 9322 provides for priority in the proceeds.

(2) The proceeds consist of the specific goods covered by the chattel paper or cash proceeds of the specific goods, even if the purchaser’s security interest in the proceeds is unperfected.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a) of Section 9331, a purchaser of an instrument has priority over a security
 interest in the instrument perfected by a method other than possession if the purchaser gives value and takes possession of the instrument in good faith and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

(e) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), the holder of a purchase money security interest in inventory gives new value for chattel paper constituting proceeds of the inventory.

(f) For purposes of subdivisions (b) and (d), if the authoritative copies of the record evidencing chattel paper or an instrument indicate that the chattel paper or instrument has been assigned to an identified secured party other than the purchaser, a purchaser of the chattel paper or instrument has knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 51.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9331.

(a) This division does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, a protected purchaser of a security, or a qualifying purchaser of a controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible. These holders or purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected, to the extent provided in Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101), Division 7 (commencing with Section 7101), Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101), and Division 12 (commencing with Section 12101).

(b) This division
 does not limit the rights of or impose liability on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of a claim under Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) and Division 12 (commencing with Section 12101).

(c) Filing under this division does not constitute notice of a claim or defense to the holders, purchasers, or persons described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 52.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9332.

(a) A transferee of tangible money takes the money free of a security interest if the transferee receives possession of the money without acting in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

(b) A transferee of funds from a deposit account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account
 if the transferee receives the funds without acting in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

(c) A transferee of electronic money takes the money free of a security interest if the transferee obtains control of the money without acting in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 53.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9333.

(a) In this section, “possessory lien” means an interest, other than a security interest or an agricultural lien which satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) It secures payment or performance of an obligation for services or materials furnished with respect to goods by a person in the ordinary course of the person’s business.

(2) It is created by statute or rule of law in favor of the person.

(3) Its effectiveness depends on the person’s possession of the goods.

(b) A possessory lien on goods has priority over a security interest in the goods unless the lien is created by a statute that expressly provides otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9334.

(a) A security interest under this division may be created in goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures. A security interest does not exist under this division in ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

(b) This division does not prevent creation of an encumbrance upon fixtures under real property law.

(c) In cases not governed by subdivisions (d) to (h), inclusive, a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the related real property other than the debtor.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (h), a perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in possession of the real property and all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The security interest is a purchase money security interest.

(2) The interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures.

(3) The security interest is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become fixtures or within 20 days thereafter.

(e) A perfected
 security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The debtor has an interest of record in the real property or is in possession of the real property and both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The security interest is perfected by a fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record.

(B) The security interest has priority over any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner.

(2) The fixtures are readily removable factory or office machines or readily removable replacements of
 domestic appliances that are consumer goods.

(3) The conflicting interest is a lien on the real property obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the security interest was perfected by any method permitted by this division.

(4) The security interest is both of the following:

(A) Created in a manufactured home in a manufactured home transaction.

(B) Perfected pursuant to a statute described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9311.

(f) A security interest in fixtures, whether or not perfected, has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real
 property if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The encumbrancer or owner has, in a signed
 record, consented to the security interest or disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures.

(2) The debtor has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner.

(g) The priority of the security interest under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) continues for a reasonable time if the debtor’s right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner terminates.

(h) A mortgage is a construction mortgage to the extent that it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on land, including the acquisition cost of the land, if a recorded record of the mortgage so indicates. Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), a security interest in
 fixtures is subordinate to a construction mortgage if a record of the mortgage is recorded before the goods become fixtures and the goods become fixtures before the completion of the construction. A mortgage has this priority to the same extent as a construction mortgage to the extent that it is given to refinance a construction mortgage.

(i) A perfected security interest in crops growing on real property has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in, or is in possession of, the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 54.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9335.

(a) A security interest may be created in an accession and continues in collateral that becomes an accession.

(b) If a security interest is perfected when the collateral becomes an accession, the security interest remains perfected in the collateral.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), the other provisions of this chapter determine the priority of a security interest in an accession.

(d) A security interest in an accession is subordinate to a security interest in the whole which is perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate of title statute under subdivision (b) of Section 9311.

(e) After default, subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with subdivision 9601), a secured party may remove an accession from other goods if the security interest in the accession has priority over the claims of every person having an interest in the
 whole.

(f) A secured party that removes an accession from other goods under subdivision (e) shall promptly reimburse any holder of a security interest or other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other goods, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the whole or the other goods. The secured party need not reimburse the holder or owner for any diminution in value of the whole or the other goods caused by the absence of the accession removed or by any necessity for replacing it. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9336.

(a) In this section, “commingled goods” means goods that are physically united with other goods in such a manner that their identity is lost in a product or mass.

(b) A security interest does not exist in commingled goods as such. However, a security interest may attach to a product or mass that results when goods become commingled goods.

(c) If collateral becomes commingled goods, a security interest attaches to the product or mass.

(d) If a security interest in collateral is perfected before the collateral becomes commingled goods, the security interest that attaches to the product or mass under subdivision (c) is perfected.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), the other provisions of this chapter determine the priority of a security interest that attaches to the product or mass under subdivision (c).

(f) If more than one security interest attaches to the product or mass under subdivision (c), the following rules determine priority:

(1) A security interest that is perfected under subdivision (d) has priority over a security interest that is unperfected at the time the collateral becomes commingled goods.

(2) If more than one security interest is perfected under subdivision (d), the security interests rank equally in proportion to the value of the collateral at the time it became commingled goods.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9337.

If, while a security interest in goods is perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction, this state issues a certificate of title that does not show that the goods are subject to the security interest or contain a statement that they may be subject to security interests not shown on the certificate both of the following apply:

(1) A buyer of the goods, other than a person in the business of selling goods of that kind, takes free of the security interest if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the goods after issuance of the certificate and without knowledge of the security interest.

(2) The security interest is subordinate to a conflicting security interest in the goods that attaches, and is perfected under subdivision (b) of Section 9311, after issuance of the certificate and without the conflicting secured party’s knowledge of the security interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9338.

If a security interest or agricultural lien is perfected by a filed financing statement providing information described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 9516 which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed, both of the following apply:

(1) The security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to a conflicting perfected security interest in the collateral to the extent that the holder of the conflicting security interest gives value in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information.

(2) A purchaser, other than a secured party, of the collateral takes free of the security interest or agricultural lien to the extent that, in reasonable reliance upon the incorrect information, the purchaser gives value and, in the case of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments,
 or a security certificate, receives delivery of the collateral.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9339.

This division does not preclude subordination by agreement by a person entitled to priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9340.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a bank with which a deposit account is maintained may exercise any right of recoupment or setoff against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the application of this division to a security interest in a deposit account does not affect a right of recoupment or setoff of the secured party as to a deposit account maintained with the secured party.

(c) The exercise by a bank of a setoff against a deposit account is ineffective against a secured party that holds a security interest in the deposit account which is perfected by control under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104, if the setoff is based on a claim against the debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9341.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of Section 9340, and unless the bank otherwise agrees in a signed record, a bank’s rights and duties with respect to a deposit account maintained with the bank are not terminated, suspended, or modified by any of the following:

(1) The creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the deposit account.

(2) The bank’s knowledge of the security interest.

(3) The bank’s receipt of instructions from the secured party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 55.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9342.

This division does not require a bank to enter into an agreement of the kind described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9104, even if its customer so requests or directs. A bank that has entered into such an agreement is not required to confirm the existence of the agreement to another person unless requested to do so by its customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Rights of Third Parties [9401. - 9409.]

9401.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) and in Sections 9406, 9407, 9408, and 9409, whether a debtor’s rights in collateral may be voluntarily or involuntarily transferred is governed by law other than this division.

(b) An agreement between the debtor and secured party which prohibits a transfer of the debtor’s rights in collateral or makes the transfer a default does not prevent the transfer from taking effect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9402.

The existence of a security interest, agricultural lien, or authority given to a debtor to dispose of or use collateral, without more, does not subject a secured party to liability in contract or tort for the debtor’s acts or omissions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.

(a) In this section, “value” has the meaning provided in subdivision (a) of Section 3303.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an agreement between an account debtor and an assignor not to assert against an assignee any claim or defense that the account debtor may have against the assignor is enforceable by an assignee that takes an assignment that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) It is taken for value.

(2) It is taken in good faith.

(3) It is taken without notice of a claim of a property or possessory right to the property assigned.

(4) It is taken without notice of a defense or claim in recoupment of the type that may be asserted against a person entitled to enforce a negotiable instrument under subdivision (a) of Section 3305.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to defenses of a type that may be asserted against a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument under subdivision (b) of Section 3305.

(d) In a consumer transaction, if a record evidences the account debtor’s obligation, law other than this division requires that the record include a statement to the effect that the rights of an assignee are subject to claims or defenses that the account debtor could assert against the original obligee, and the record does not include such a statement, then both of the following apply:

(1) The record has the same effect as if the record included such a statement.
